New York, session 2025-2026, A7025.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 1370-f to read as follows: 3 § 1370-f. Lead testing of child participants in WIC programs. The 4 department shall require that all children participants in the special 5 supplemental food program for women, infants, and children (WIC program) 6 authorized by 42 U.S.C. § 1786 shall receive lead testing at the inter- 7 vals and using the methods specified by the department in this title. 8 Federal funds provided for administration of the WIC program shall not 9 be used to implement or administer the provisions of this section. Fund- 10 ing, to the extent permitted by federal law, shall be made available 11 through medical assistance for needy persons under title eleven of arti- 12 cle five of the social services law. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 14 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03091-01-5